Wyoming, session 2025, HB0013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The integrated test center established in 2014
Wyoming session laws, chapter 26, section 334(h)(ii) and
(n), as amended by 2015 Wyoming session laws, chapter 142,
HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
section 334(h)(ii) and (o), shall be transferred to the
University of Wyoming school of energy resources on the
effective date of this act. All property, implements,
fixtures, facilities, equipment, obligations, rights and
unexpended funds of the integrated test center owned or
held by the state of Wyoming shall be transferred to the
University of Wyoming school of energy resources on the
effective date of this act.

(b) The governor's office, Wyoming energy authority
and school of energy resources shall, to the greatest
extent possible, take all actions necessary to transfer any
existing agreements or contracts of the integrated test
center to the school of energy resources.

Section 2. W.S. 21-17-117.1 is created to read:

21-17-117.1. Integrated test center; governance;
duties; powers.

(a) The integrated test center established in 2014
Wyoming session laws, chapter 26, section 334(h)(ii) and
(n), as amended by 2015 Wyoming session laws, chapter 142,
HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
section 334(h)(ii) and (o), is hereby codified and
continued as the integrated test center.

(b) The University of Wyoming school of energy
resources, under direction from the energy resources
council, shall oversee and operate the integrated test
center.

(c) The school of energy resources, under direction
from the energy resources council, shall establish the
structure and policies for the operation of the integrated
test center consistent with the objectives of this section
and W.S. 21-17-117.

(d) In operating the integrated test center, the
school of energy resources shall:

(i) Design, construct and operate a facility to
study the capture, sequestration, utilization and
management of carbon dioxide emissions or other emissions
and other research projects. For purposes of this
paragraph, an integrated test center designed and
constructed under 2014 Wyoming session laws, chapter 26,
HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
section 334(n) shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements
of this paragraph;

(ii) Provide opportunities for testing and
research projects at the facility specified in paragraph
(i) of this subsection;

(iii) Enter into leases in accordance with the
following:

(A) The school of energy resources shall
enter into leases or shall assign existing leases with
owners of real property where the facility specified in
paragraph (i) of this subsection is located. Any lease
entered into under this subparagraph shall offer the owner
of the real property the right of first refusal to purchase
the state's ownership interest in the physical plant at
fair market value after conclusion of all integrated test
center activities by the school of energy resources and its
partners and research tenants;

(B) The school of energy resources shall
enter into subleases with persons and entities who wish to
HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
perform research or other projects at the facility before
those persons or entities become tenants and begin work at
the facility;

(C) Signed agreements between all partners,
research tenants and lessors regarding the integrated test
center and the school of energy resources shall include
provisions retaining sovereign immunity for the state of
Wyoming and the University of Wyoming and provisions for
the indemnification from any liability, damages and legal
fees incurred by the University of Wyoming or the state of
Wyoming from any claims, causes of action, injuries or
judgments resulting from the use of the integrated test
center by an employee, contractor or guest of a partner,
research tenant or lessor.

(iv) Prioritize space at the facility
established under paragraph (i) of this subsection and
resources to projects that the school of energy resources
and the energy resources council determine would:

HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
(A) Have a high likelihood for commercial
success and are at the correct developmental stage for
testing at the integrated test center;

(B) Increase the knowledge base within the
state of Wyoming on the capture, sequestration, utilization
and management of carbon dioxide emissions or other
emissions with the potential benefit of improving the
future marketability of Wyoming energy sources;

(C) Increase the national and international
exposure of the state of Wyoming and its agencies,
institutions, instrumentalities and political subdivisions
as participants and locations for innovation in energy;

(D) Add ancillary or supplemental value to
Wyoming products or byproducts; or

(E) Lead to the development of methods or
products that may advance the future use of Wyoming's
natural resources.

HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
(e) The state of Wyoming, by and through the
University of Wyoming school of energy resources, shall
have sole ownership of the physical plant of any test
facility constructed in accordance with paragraph (d)(i) of
this section that was constructed with state funds. State
ownership shall not extend to the real property on which
the physical plant is located nor to any improvement,
equipment or fixture purchased with funds that are not
state funds.

(f) Not later than October 1 of each year and as part
of the report required under W.S. 21-17-117, the school of
energy resources shall report to the joint minerals,
business and economic development interim committee and the
joint appropriations committee on:

(i) The work of the integrated test center in
the past fiscal year, including the work and use of the
research facility established under paragraph (d)(i) of
this section;

(ii) All accomplishments of the integrated test
center in the past fiscal year and benefits accruing to
HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
Wyoming's economy as a result of the integrated test
center's work;

(iii) The current occupancy of the integrated
test center, including lessees and the projects lessees are
conducting at the integrated test center.

Section 3. W.S. 21-17-117(c)(iv), by creating a new
paragraph (v) and (f) is amended to read:

21-17-117. School of energy resources; creation
authorized; University of Wyoming energy resources council
established; reports; budget submittal.

(c) The school of energy resources shall:

(iv) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, develop and submit a budget for the school for
approval by the energy resources council and then shall
submit the budget for review in accordance with W.S.
9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014. The school of energy resources
may include in the budget submitted under this paragraph a
budget for the integrated test center specified in W.S.
HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
21-17-117.1. The school of energy resources shall submit
its budget to the governor after approval by the energy
resources council created in subsection (e) of this
section. The school of energy resources shall submit a copy
of its budget for informational purposes to the
university's board of trustees;

(v) Oversee and manage the integrated test
center in accordance with W.S. 21-17-117.1.

(f) The university shall report annually, not later
than October 1, to the joint minerals, business and
economic development interim committee, the joint
appropriations committee and the joint education interim
committee regarding all revenues to and expenditures by the
school of energy resources during the preceding fiscal
year, any budget prepared and submitted under paragraph
(c)(iv) of this section, accomplishments of the school of
energy resources and its benefits to Wyoming's energy
economy. The report submitted under this subsection shall
include a report on the integrated test center in
accordance with W.S. 21-17.117.1(f).

HB0013

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0045
Section 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
impair existing agreements, contracts or other obligations
of the integrated test center that were entered into by the
integrated test center, the Wyoming energy authority, the
office of the governor or the University of Wyoming school
of energy resources before the effective date of this act.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0013